West Virginia, session 2025, SB332.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5A. Authorization for Department of human services to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5A-1. Department of Human Services. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on October 22, 2024, authorized under the authority of §9-3-6 of this code,  relating to the Department of Human Services (pilot program for drug screening of applicants for cash assistance, 78 CSR 26), is authorized.